Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3402
Division of Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and Marketing; created.

There is hereby established a Division of Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and Marketing in the Department of Agriculture.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 2.
December 31, 2027